Maryland, session 2026, HB1508.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1508*

HOUSE BILL 1508
8–646.
(a) Except as permitted by this section or in accordance with a permit obtained
from the Administration, a person may not:
(1) Make an opening in any State highway;
(2) Place any structure on any State highway;
(3) Change or renew any structure placed on any State highway;
(4) Dig up any State highway for any purpose, including the placement of
pipes, sewers, poles, wires, or rails;
(5) Plant or remove any tree on any State highway; or
(6) Place any obstruction or improvement on any State highway.
(b) (1) The Administration may issue a permit for work otherwise prohibited
by subsection (a) of this section.
(2) Work done under the permit shall be performed to the satisfaction of
the Administration and under its supervision.
(E) (1) ON RECEIPT OF WITHIN 10 DAYS AFTER AN APPLICANT SUBMITS
AN APPLICATION FOR A PERMIT UNDER THIS SECTION FOR A TYPE 2 OR TYPE 3
PROJECT, AS DESIGNATED BY THE ADMINISTRATION, THE ADMINISTRATION, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE
APPLICANT SHALL IMMEDIATELY PROVIDE NOTICE OF THE APPLICATION TO EACH
MEMBER OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY WHO REPRESENTS THE STATE LEGISLATIVE
DISTRICT IN WHICH THE PROPOSED WORK IS TO BE PERFORMED.
(2) THE NOTICE REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL
INCLUDE:
(I) THE NAME OF THE APPLICANT;
(II) THE LOCATION OF THE PROPOSED WORK;
(III) THE EXPECTED STARTING DATE FOR THE PROPOSED WORK;
AND
(IV) A BRIEF DESCRIPTION OF THE NATURE OF THE PROPOSED
WORK.

HOUSE BILL 1508 3
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.